Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB69.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 321.181 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Allied animal health professional" or "AAHP" means a professional who has completed an approved allied
animal health professional program as defined in an[by] administrative regulation promulgated by the board
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A[regulation] and who offers specialized, limited services as defined in
this chapter or by an administrative regulation to an animal patient in an area of practice as identified in
Section 2 of this Act[animal chiropractic];
(2) (a) "Allied animal health professional facility" or "AAHP facility" means any building, fixed facility, place,
premises, mobile facility, mobile unit, or location from which the practice of allied animal health
professionals on animals is conducted or performed, including but not limited to a mobile clinic or
facility, outpatient clinic, emergency facility, specialty facility, referral facility, human facility, or
center.
(b) An AAHP facility includes all fixed buildings used in AAHP practice at a single physical premises
location.
(c) An AAHP facility does not include:
1. The premises of a client unless a fixed allied animal health professional facility is located on the
premises;
2. A research facility;
3. A federal military base;
4. Locations for temporary animal exhibition;
5. State or federal regulatory facilities; or
6. An approved allied animal health professional program location;
(3) "Allied animal health professional manager" or "AAHP manager" means at least one (1) board-
licensed[permitted] AAHP who registers to assume responsibility for the registration, management, and
operation of a registered allied animal health professional facility;
(4) "Allied animal health professional license[permit]" or "AAHP license[permit]" means a credential issued to an
allied animal health professional who is licensed[permitted] by the board to practice on animals in the
Commonwealth and to conduct specialized services for an animal patient limited to the scope of work as
defined in this chapter or by the board in administrative regulation[ by the board];
(5) "Animal" means any member of the animal kingdom other than a human, whether living or dead;
(6) "Animal chiropractic" means the science of diagnosing and adjusting or manipulating the subluxations of the
articulations of an animal's spine and its adjacent tissues and by applying methods of treatment designed to
augment those adjustments or manipulations;
(7) "Animal control agency" means an animal shelter fulfilling the duties required pursuant to KRS Chapter
258 that is owned, contracted with, or in service on behalf of a county or municipality;
(8) "Animal shelter" means a public agency or private humane society, society for the prevention of cruelty to
animals, animal protection shelter or control agency, or other facility that provides shelter and care for
homeless, stray, unwanted, or injured domestic animals;
(9)[(8)] "Applicant" means a person who submits an application for licensure, certification, license[permit], or
registration, whether complete or not, to the board;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(10)[(9)] "Approved allied animal health professional program" means a school or educational program offering
specialized training to provide limited services to an animal patient that has been approved by the board in an
administrative regulation as meeting its administrative standards;
(11)[(10)] "Approved foreign equivalency program" means a school or educational program that has been
approved by the board as meeting its administrative standards, which offers additional training and testing for
persons who graduated from a non-board-approved veterinary medical program or non-board-approved
veterinary technology program;
(12)[(11)] "Approved program of continuing education" means an educational program approved by the board or
offered by an approved provider of continuing education;
(13)[(12)] "Approved provider of continuing education" means any person that has met the requirements of the
board to provide educational courses that are designed to ensure continued competence in the practice of
veterinary medicine, veterinary technology, animal euthanasia, or other area of practice governed by the board;
(14)[(13)] "Approved veterinary medical program" means a school of veterinary medicine or a veterinary medical
education program that has been approved by the board as meeting its administrative standards;
(15)[(14)] "Approved veterinary technology program" means a school of veterinary technology or a veterinary
technology education program that has been approved by the board as meeting its administrative standards;
(16)[(15)] "Background check" means an inquiry within a system for the collection, processing, preservation, or
dissemination of criminal history records maintained by one (1) or more local, state, or federal agencies;
(17)[(16)] "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Veterinary Examiners;
(18)[(17)] "Certificate holder" means a person certified by the board;
(19)[(18)] "Certified animal control agency" means an animal shelter that is certified by the board;
(20)[(19)] "Certified animal euthanasia specialist" means a person employed by a certified animal control agency
who is authorized by the board to humanely euthanize animals by administering drugs designated by the board
for euthanasia and sedation including animals owned by the certified animal control agency or animals in
emergency care circumstances;
(21)[(20)] "Chemical restraint" means the use of any controlled substance, veterinary drug, prescription, veterinary
prescription drug, or legend drug that assists in the restraint of[restrains] or sedates[tranquilizes] the animal;
(22)[(21)] "Client" means the owner, owner's agent, or other person presenting the patient for care, who has
entered into an agreement with a veterinarian or allied animal health professional on behalf of a patient for the
purposes of obtaining veterinary medical services or allied animal health professional services in person or by
any means of communication or telehealth;
(23)[(22)] "Compensation" includes any gift, bonus, fee, money, credit, or other thing of value;
(24)[(23)] "Complementary and alternative veterinary medicine therapies" means a heterogeneous group of
preventive, diagnostic, and therapeutic philosophies and practices that are not considered part of conventional
veterinary medicine. These therapies include but are not limited to:
(a) Veterinary acupuncture, acutherapy, and acupressure;
(b) Veterinary homeopathy;
(c) Veterinary manual or manipulative therapy, such as therapies based on techniques practiced in
osteopathy, chiropractic, or physical medicine and therapy;
(d) Veterinary nutraceutical therapy; and
(e) Veterinary phytotherapy;
(25)[(24)] "Consultation" means a veterinarian's receipt of advice, assistance in person, or by any method of
communication from a veterinarian or other person whose expertise, in the opinion of the veterinarian, would
benefit a patient while the responsibility for the welfare of the patient remains with the veterinarian receiving
consultation;
(26)[(25)] "Continuing education" means training that is designed to ensure continued competence in the practice
of veterinary medicine, veterinary technology, or for certified animal euthanasia specialists,
licensed[permitted] allied animal health professionals, or any board credential holder;

CHAPTER 87 3
(27)[(26)] "Continuing education contact hour" means a fifty (50) minute clock hour of instruction, not including
breaks or meals;
(28)[(27)] "Conviction" means a formal declaration that someone is guilty of a crime by a court of competent
jurisdiction and shall include a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, a no contest plea, a plea of
nolo contendere, or a guilty plea;
(29)[(28)] "Credential" means:
(a) Any license, certificate, permit, registration, or other credential issued or approved by the board; or
(b) The authorization to serve as the veterinarian manager or registered responsible party designated on a
veterinary facility registration, as the AAHP manager or registered responsible party designated on an
AAHP facility registration, or as the designated on-site manager designated for a certified animal
control agency;
(30)[(29)] "Credential holder" means a person who holds an approved credential issued by the board, which may
be one (1) or more of the following:
(a) Certificate;
(b) License;
(c)[ Permit;
(d)] Registration; or
(d)[(e)] Special permit;
(31)[(30)] "Designated on-site manager" means a person who registers with the board to assume responsibility for
the ordering, management, use, and disposal of controlled substances at a certified animal control agency;
(32)[(31)] "Discipline" means any final order, settlement agreement, reprimand, fine, or other adverse
consequence assessed against a person by the board or any of its counterparts in other jurisdictions;
(33)[(32)] "Embryo transfer" means to remove an embryo from any animal for the purpose of transplanting the
embryo into another animal, cryopreserving the embryo, or implanting the embryo into any animal, including
food and companion animals;
(34)[(33)] "Emergency care" means immediate treatment that is necessary to sustain life or end suffering of an
animal that is in a life-threatening condition;
(35) "Equine dentistry" means any diagnosis, treatment, or surgical procedure performed on the head or oral
cavity of an equine animal, including:
(a) Any procedure that invades the tissues of the oral cavity, including a procedure to:
1. Remove sharp enamel projections;
2. Treat malocclusions of the teeth;
3. Reshape teeth; or
4. Extract one (1) or more teeth;
(b) The treatment or extraction of damaged or diseased teeth;
(c) The treatment of diseased teeth through restoration and endodontic procedures;
(d) Periodontal treatments, including the:
1. Removal of calculus, soft deposits, plaque, and stains above the gum line; and
2. Smoothing, filing, and polishing of tooth surfaces; and
(e) Dental radiography;
(36)[(34)] "Examination" means a qualifying examination approved by the board as a condition for certification,
licensure, permit, or registration;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(37)[(35)] "Expired" is a licensure status whereby the credential holder failed to renew the credential in a timely
manner in accordance with the deadline set by the board;
(38)[(36)] "Extralabel use" means actual use or intended use of a drug in an animal in a manner that is not in
accordance with the approved labeling and includes but is not limited to:
(a) Use in species or production class not listed in the labeling;
(b) Use for indications such as disease or other conditions not listed in the labeling;
(c) Use at dosage levels, frequencies, or routes of administration other than those stated in the labeling; and
(d) Deviation from the labeled withdrawal time based on these different uses;
(39)[(37)] "Felony" means a criminal act as defined by any jurisdiction or by definition under federal law;
(40)[(38)] "Fixed facility" means a permanent location that is generally not moveable;
(41)[(39)] "Grievance" or "complaint" means any allegation of misconduct that may constitute a violation of this
chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated under the authority of this chapter;
(42)[(40)] "Impaired" means that a credential holder, designated on-site manager, veterinarian manager, AAHP
manager, or registered responsible party may reasonably be unable to perform that person's duties with
competence, skill, and safety because of a physical or mental disability or incapacity, including deterioration
of mental capacity, loss of motor skills, or substance use or disorder of sufficient degree which may reasonably
diminish the person's ability to deliver competent patient care;
(43)[(41)] "In-person" means physically in the same physical space;
(44)[(42)] "Informed consent" or "consent" means the veterinarian or allied animal health professional
licensee[permittee] has informed the client or the client's authorized representative in a manner understood by
the client or the client's authorized representative of the diagnostic and treatment options, potential outcomes,
risk assessment, prognosis, and options and the client has consented to or knowingly declined the
recommended services or treatment;
(45)[(43)] "Jurisdiction" means:
(a) Any Commonwealth, state, or territory of the United States of America, including the District of
Columbia;
(b) Any province of Canada; or
(c) A regulatory organization, including an international body;
that issues licenses, registrations, permits, or certificates related to the professional fields of veterinary
medicine;
(46)[(44)] "Licensee" means a person licensed by the board under this chapter;
(47)[(45)] "Livestock" means bovines, equines, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, captured or cultivated aquatic
species, farm-raised cervidae and camelidae, bees, and any other species used in the production of fiber, meat,
eggs, honey, milk, and other animal food products;
(48)[(46)] "Mobile facility" or "mobile unit" means a motor vehicle that is utilized pursuant to KRS 321.205;
(49)[(47)] "Patient" means any animal or group of animals receiving care from a veterinarian, veterinary
technician, veterinary assistant, animal euthanasia specialist,[ or] allied animal health professional, veterinary
student, veterinary technician student, or veterinary practice staff;
(50)[(48)] "Permittee" means a person permitted by the board under this chapter;
(51)[(49)] "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association, joint venture, cooperative, corporation,
governmental body, or any other group, legal entity, or combination acting in concert, and whether or not
acting as a principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or as any kind of legal or personal representative, or as the
successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant, employee, director, officer, or any other representative of
the person;
(52)[(50)] "Practice of veterinary medicine" means any person who practices veterinary medicine when
performing any one (1) or more of the following on an animal:

CHAPTER 87 5
(a) Directly or indirectly diagnoses, prognoses, corrects, changes, relieves, prevents, supervises,
recommends, or performs medical or surgical treatment, including complementary and alternative
veterinary medicine therapies, obstetrics, dentistry, oral surgery, acupuncture, laser therapy,
manipulation, and all other branches or specialties of veterinary medicine, for the diagnosis, prevention,
cure, or relief of a wound, defect, deformity, fracture, bodily injury, disease, or dental, physical,
behavioral, or mental condition;
(b) Prescribes, dispenses, or administers any drug, medicine, anesthetic, biologic, appliance, apparatus,
application, treatment, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique for veterinary purposes,
or performs euthanasia, in accordance with the applicable federal statutes and regulations governing
controlled prescription drugs, legend drugs, and veterinary drugs;
(c) Performs any manual procedure for the diagnosis, treatment, or both of pregnancy, sterility, or
infertility, including embryo transfer;
(d) Represents oneself, directly or indirectly, as engaging in the practice of veterinary medicine; or
(e) Uses any words, letters, or titles as to induce the belief that the individual using them is authorized to
practice veterinary medicine under this chapter with such use being prima facie evidence of the
intention to represent oneself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine;
(53)[(51)] "Practice of veterinary technology" means:
(a) The practices of veterinary technology when performing patient care, professional medical care,
monitoring, treatment, or other services on an animal that require a technical understanding of
veterinary medicine on the basis of written or oral instruction of a veterinarian, or under supervision of
a veterinarian; and
(b) 1. Representation of oneself, directly or indirectly, as a licensed veterinary technician or "LVT"; or
2. Use of any words, letters, or titles under circumstances that would induce the belief that the
individual using them is authorized to practice as a veterinary technician under this chapter, with
such use being prima facie evidence of the intention to represent oneself as engaged in practice
as a veterinary technician;
(54)[(52)] "Premises" means any place where an animal is located when veterinary medicine is being practiced;
(55)[(53)] "Prescription" means an order for a drug or medicine, combination or mixture of drugs or medicines, or
proprietary preparation that is signed, given, or authorized and intended for use in the diagnosis, cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in a patient;
(56)[(54)] "Registrant" means a person or premises registered with the board under this chapter;
(57)[(55)] "Registered allied animal health professional facility" or "registered AAHP facility" means an AAHP
facility that is registered with the board;
(58)[(56)] "Registered facility" means any AAHP facility or any veterinary facility that is registered with the
board;
(59)[(57)] "Registered responsible party" means at least one (1) person documented as the[who]:
(a) Entity that[Does not otherwise hold a credential with the board who] is designated as the registered
responsible party on a facility registration and is responsible for its operation and management in
conjunction with the veterinarian manager or allied animal health professional manager; and
(b) Entity that is held accountable to the board as a credential holder for any violation of this chapter and
its associated administrative regulations. At a minimum, the registered party shall include all persons,
owners, and corporate owners of the registered veterinary facility or allied animal health professional
facility;
(60)[(58)] "Registered veterinary facility" means a veterinary facility that is registered with the board;
(61)[(59)] "Supervision" pertains to any of the following:
(a) "Supervising veterinarian" means a veterinarian who assumes responsibility for the veterinary care
given to a patient by an individual working under the veterinarian's direction and has examined the
patient pursuant to currently acceptable standards of care;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) "Immediate supervision" means the supervising veterinarian is physically in the immediate area and
within audible and visual range of the patient and the individual treating the patient;
(c) "Direct supervision" means the supervising veterinarian is readily available on the premises where the
patient is being treated; and
(d) "Indirect supervision" means the supervising veterinarian need not be on the premises but has given
either written or oral instructions for the treatment of the patient and is readily available for
communication;
(62)[(60)] "Teleadvice" means the provision of any health information, opinion, guidance, or recommendation
concerning prudent future actions that are not specific to a particular patient's health, illness, or injury;
(63)[(61)] "Teleconsulting" means telehealth in which a veterinarian, veterinary technician, AAHP, or other
credential holder uses telehealth tools to communicate with a specialist or another professional to gain insights
and advice on the care of a patient;
(64)[(62)] "Telehealth" means all uses of technology to remotely gather and deliver health information, advice,
education, and care;
(65)[(63)] "Telemedicine" or "connected care" means the integration of digital technologies to enhance and
support the VCPR and facilitate proactive and ongoing care through improved communication, diagnosis, and
monitoring;
(66)[(64)] "Telemonitoring," "mHealth," or "mobile health," means remote monitoring of a patient who is not at
the same location as the health care provider;
(67)[(65)] "Telesupervision" means the supervision of individuals using media such as audio or audio/video
conference, text messaging, and e-mail;
(68)[(66)] "Teletriage" means the safe, appropriate, and timely assessment and management of an animal patient
via electronic consultation with its owner, regardless of whether there is an immediate referral to a veterinarian
and where a diagnosis is not rendered;
(69)[(67)] "Veterinarian" means an individual who is licensed to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine
under this chapter;
(70)[(68)] "Veterinarian manager" means at least one (1) Kentucky-licensed veterinarian who registers to assume
responsibility for the registration, management, and operation of a registered veterinary facility;
(71)[(69)] "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" or "VCPR" has the same meaning as in KRS 321.185;
(72)[(70)] "Veterinary assistant" means a layperson without credentials[or noncredential holder] who is employed
by a veterinarian in accordance with KRS 321.443;
(73)[(71)] (a) "Veterinary facility" means any building, fixed facility, place, premises, mobile facility, or
mobile unit location from which the practice of veterinary medicine and practice of veterinary
technology are conducted or performed, including but not limited to a mobile clinic or facility,
outpatient clinic, veterinary hospital or clinic, emergency facility, specialty facility, referral facility or
center, temporary health clinic, or spay/neuter location. A veterinary facility shall include all fixed
buildings used for the practice of veterinary medicine at a single physical premises location.
(b) "Veterinary facility" does not include:
1. The premises of a veterinary client unless a fixed veterinary facility is located on the veterinary
client's premises;
2. A research facility;
3. A federal military base;
4. Locations for temporary animal exhibition;
5. State or federal regulatory facilities;
6. Officially designated emergency and disaster response locations;
7. A facility with current accreditation by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums; or

CHAPTER 87 7
8. An American Veterinary Medical Association-accredited college of veterinary medicine or
veterinary technology;
(74)[(72)] "Veterinary specialist" means a veterinarian that has been awarded and maintains certification from an
American Veterinary Medical Association-recognized veterinary specialty organization, program, or college,
and is registered in this specialty with the board;
(75)[(73)] "Veterinary student" means:
(a) A person enrolled in an approved veterinary medical program while pursuing a degree in veterinary
medicine; or
(b) A person in a post-Doctor of Veterinary Medicine temporary private internship, residency, or veterinary
hospital-based program, not to exceed thirty (30) days in a calendar year;
(76)[(74)] "Veterinary technician" means a person who has completed an approved veterinary technology
program, is licensed in accordance with this chapter, and meets the requirements in KRS 321.441;
(77)[(75)] "Veterinary wellness committee" means a committee appointed by the board that is composed of
individuals who have expertise in the areas of alcohol abuse, chemical dependence, drug abuse, or physical or
mental condition designated by the board to perform activities related to the veterinary wellness program; and
(78)[(76)] "Veterinary wellness program" means the board-sponsored program for the identification, intervention,
and monitoring of credential holders or applicants who may be impaired as a result of alcohol abuse, chemical
dependence, drug abuse, or any physical or mental condition.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 321 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall issue an allied animal health professional license to a person who is qualified to be licensed
under this section. A person is qualified to be licensed as an AAHP if the person:
(a) Has completed an application for AAHP licensing approved by the board through the promulgation
of an administrative regulation;
(b) Has paid the application fee and the appropriate examination fee;
(c) Is a person of good moral character. As an element of good moral character, the board shall require
each applicant for licensure to submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints for the purpose of
obtaining criminal records checks, pursuant to KRS 321.189 and any other applicable law. All good
moral character information, including the information obtained through the criminal background
checks, shall be relevant to licensure eligibility determinations to the extent permitted by law;
(d) Has graduated and received a certification from an approved allied animal health professional
program;
(e) Has achieved a passing score on any examinations required by the board in an administrative
regulation;
(f) Has been approved for an AAHP license by the board; and
(g) Has complied with any other requirements of this chapter or the administrative regulations
promulgated by the board.
(2) An AAHP licensee may work on animals in one (1) of the following areas of the practice of veterinary
medicine so long as that practice is in accordance with and within the limitations established by the board
in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, including requirements
for candidate qualifications, examinations, and applications:
(a) Animal chiropractic; or
(b) Equine dentistry.
(3) (a) An allied animal health professional seeking to work within the allowable scope of practice on
animals shall be required to apply for an AAHP license from the board to practice on animals.
(b) If an applicant is approved for a license, the board shall designate the area of practice specific to the
AAHP licensee on the license.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) A separate AAHP license shall be required for each scope of practice as listed in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) (a) The board may establish by administrative regulation procedures to license candidates for
qualification in each distinct area of practice allowable under the AAHP license class by substituting
experience for the education requirements in subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(b) As part of the application for an AAHP license, candidates who apply under this subsection shall:
1. Have been a Kentucky resident for at least twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date
of application;
2. Provide a letter of recommendation from a minimum of two (2) Kentucky licensed
veterinarians;
3. Provide proof of employment or an Internal Revenue Service form 1099 showing self-
employment in an area of practice as identified in subsection (2) of this section for a minimum
of ten (10) years prior to the date of application for animal chiropractic, and a minimum of
five (5) years prior to the date of application for equine dentistry;
4. Provide details regarding the duration of experience and times during which practice
occurred, including average number of hours of practice per year; and
5. Provide a letter of good standing from any other jurisdictions in which the applicant is
credentialed.
(c) The candidate application window under this subsection shall not exceed eighteen (18) months from
the effective date of the administrative regulation governing applications for the AAHP license area
of the practice. After the application window closes, individuals applying for a new AAHP license
shall be required to meet the current standards of KRS Chapter 321 and administrative regulations
promulgated by the board.
(5) AAHP licensees shall be required to register each premises or mobile unit from which he or she practices
on animals as a registered AAHP facility in accordance with KRS 321.203, 321.205, and Section 10 of this
Act.
(6) AAHP licensees and AAHP registered facilities shall:
(a) Maintain an active credential with the board to maintain authorization to operate;
(b) Pay the application, renewal, reinstatement, and other required fees as established by the board in an
administrative regulation;
(c) Renew the board credential on a schedule as established by the board in administrative regulation;
(d) Comply with all applicable provisions of KRS Chapter 321 and any administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder and other applicable state and federal laws; and
(e) Be subject to disciplinary measures for failure to comply.
(7) Controls shall be established by the board in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with
Chapter 13A regarding acquisition, distribution, and administration of drugs by AAHP licensees and their
clients for use by the AAHPs in the services offered.
(8) (a) 1. Only a board-licensed allied animal health professional who is also licensed as a chiropractor
with the Kentucky Board of Chiropractic Examiners is qualified in the State of Kentucky to
perform animal chiropractic within the limits established by the board in an administrative
regulation may use the titles "animal chiropractor," "animal chiropractic practitioner,"
"ACP," or "AC."
2. A chiropractor shall not use the titles "veterinary chiropractor" or "veterinary adjuster"
unless the chiropractor is also licensed to practice veterinary medicine in the State of
Kentucky.
3. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a licensed veterinarian from using the titles "animal
adjuster" or "animal spinal manipulation practitioner."
(b) 1. Only a duly licensed allied animal health professional who is a board-licensed equine dental
provider and is qualified in the State of Kentucky to perform equine dentistry within the limits

CHAPTER 87 9
established in Section 4 of this Act may use the titles "equine dental provider," "equine dental
practitioner," "certified equine dental provider," "CEPD," or "EDP."
2. An equine dental provider shall not use the titles "equine dentist," "veterinary dentistry," or
"veterinary dentist" unless the equine dental provider is also licensed to practice veterinary
medicine in the State of Kentucky.
3. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a licensed veterinarian from using the titles "animal
dentist" or "equine dentist."
(9) An AAHP licensee shall be held to the same standard of care as a veterinarian when the provider practices
on animals.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 321 IS CREATED TO READ:
(1) Each AAHP licensee shall submit a completed renewal application to the board and pay a renewal fee for
the renewal of the license.
(2) A sixty (60) day grace period shall be allowed after the renewal deadline during which individuals may
renew their licenses upon submission of a completed renewal application and payment of the renewal fee
plus a late renewal fee. All licenses not renewed by the grace period deadline shall expire based on the
failure of the individual to renew in a timely manner. Upon expiration, the licensee is no longer eligible to
practice as an allied animal health professional in the Commonwealth.
(3) After the sixty (60) day grace period, individuals with an expired license may have their licenses reinstated
upon submission of a completed reinstatement application and payment of the renewal fee, the renewal late
fee, and the reinstatement fee. A person who applies for reinstatement after expiration of the person's
AAHP license shall not be required to submit to an examination as a condition for reinstatement, if the
reinstatement application is made within five (5) years from the date of expiration.
(4) A suspended AAHP license is subject to expiration and termination and shall be renewed as provided in this
chapter. Renewal or reinstatement shall not entitle the licensee to engage in practice as an allied animal
health professional until the suspension has ended or is otherwise resolved by the board and the right to
practice is restored by the board.
(5) A revoked license is subject to expiration or termination but may not be renewed. If a revoked license is
reinstated, the licensee shall pay a reinstatement fee.
(6) A person who fails to reinstate his or her AAHP license within five (5) years after its expiration or
termination shall not have it renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated and the person may apply for and
obtain a new license by meeting the requirements of this chapter.
(7) The board may require that a person applying for renewal or reinstatement of a license provide evidence of
completion of continuing education as promulgated by the board in an administrative regulation.
(8) The board may grant retired or inactive license status and may establish conditions under which retired or
inactive licenses may be renewed and reinstated as set forth by the board in an administrative regulation.
(9) Fees set by the board shall be designed to fully cover the cost to operate the licensee program but shall not
exceed it.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 321 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The services provided by allied animal health professional licensees are considered the practice of
veterinary medicine that an AAHP licensee may provide to the public through authorization by the General
Assembly and within strict limitations on the scope of practice for each allowable license type as established
in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
(2) For a licensed AAHP-equine dental provider, the scope of practice is limited to the following:
(a) A licensed AAHP-equine dental provider may not perform equine dentistry unless the provider holds
an AAHP license as an equine dental provider from the board;
(b) A licensed AAHP-equine dental provider shall work under the indirect supervision of a veterinarian;
(c) A licensed AAHP-equine dental provider may perform only the following equine dental procedures
in equine species:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Removing sharp enamel dental points;
2. Removing small dental overgrowths;
3. Rostral profiling of the first cheek teeth;
4. Reducing incisors;
5. Extracting loose, deciduous teeth;
6. Removing supragingival calculus;
7. Extracting loose, mobile, or diseased teeth or dental fragments with minimal periodontal
attachments by hand and without the use of an elevator; and
8. Removing erupted, nondisplaced wolf teeth;
(d) Paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a licensed veterinary technician
employed by a veterinarian who is not a licensed AAHP-equine dental provider from performing the
equine dental procedures described in paragraph (c) of this subsection if the licensed veterinary
technician is under the direct supervision of a veterinarian;
(e) A copy of the dental chart of an equine animal shall be left with the person who authorizes an equine
dental procedure and be made available to the veterinarian holding the VCPR with the client within
an appropriate timeframe according to the condition, but no more than three (3) business days after
services are provided; and
(f) Dispensing or prescribing any medication or drug associated with any equine dental procedure
remains solely the domain of the veterinarian holding a valid VCPR with the client.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 321 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The AAHP advisory committee is hereby created as an informal advisory committee to the board.
(2) The AAHP advisory committee shall advise and assist the board in adopting rules and administrative
regulations relating to AAHP licensees.
(3) The board shall consult the advisory committee regarding matters relating to a disciplinary action that
involves an AAHP license holder.
(4) (a) The AAHP advisory committee shall be composed of members appointed by the chair of the board
with approval from a majority of a quorum of the board.
(b) The AAHP advisory committee shall include subcommittees specific to each area of practice for the
distinct types of AAHP licenses as identified in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
(c) Each subcommittee shall be composed of the following:
1. Two (2) members who are AAHP licensees with a license in active status specializing in each
of the specific areas of practice as identified in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act, have
resided in and engaged in the AAHP practice in the Commonwealth for the five (5) years
immediately preceding the date of appointment, and are of good moral character;
2. One (1) veterinarian member who holds an active veterinarian license in the Commonwealth
in good standing and who engages with at least one (1) AAHP licensee providing services in
each specific area of practice as identified in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act; and
3. The AAHP licensees and veterinarian appointees shall be unique individuals for each area of
practice as identified in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act and shall not hold more than
one seat on the AAHP advisory committee.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c)1. of this subsection, advisory committee members appointed under
paragraph (c)1. of this subsection shall not be required to hold an AAHP license issued under this
chapter until the closure of the application window period for the AAHP license type as established
in subsection (4) of Section 2 of this Act.
(e) Appointments to the advisory committee shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability,
sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees.
(5) (a) Members of the AAHP advisory committee shall be appointed for staggered five-year terms.

CHAPTER 87 11
(b) The terms of the members shall expire no more than five (5) years from the date of appointment.
(c) If a vacancy occurs during a member’s term, the chair of the board shall appoint a new member to
fill the unexpired term.
(d) An advisory committee member may not serve more than two (2) consecutive full terms.
(6) (a) It shall be a ground for removal from the AAHP advisory committee if a member:
1. Does not have at the time of appointment the qualifications required by subsection (4) of this
section and by Section 2 of this Act;
2. Does not maintain during service on the advisory committee the qualifications required by
Section 2 of this Act; and
3. Cannot discharge the member’s duties for a substantial part of the member’s term due to
illness or disability.
(b) The validity of an action of the AAHP advisory committee is not affected by the fact that the action is
taken when a ground for removal of an advisory committee member exists.
(7) (a) The chair of the board shall designate biennially an AAHP advisory committee member as the chair
of the advisory committee to serve in that capacity at the will of the chair of the board.
(b) The AAHP advisory committee or subcommittees shall meet at least one (1) time per year, or upon
request by the board chair or board executive director.
(c) A meeting of the AAHP advisory committee may be held by telephone, conference call, or video
conferencing.
(d) 1. Minutes shall be recorded for each meeting of the AAHP advisory committee.
2. A copy of the minutes shall be provided to the full board.
(e) The AAHP advisory committee may submit written reports or recommendations to the board for
review.
(8) An AAHP advisory committee member shall not be entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses or any
other form of compensation from the board other than mileage reimbursement at the current state
reimbursement rate as established by the Finance and Administration Cabinet when a meeting of the
AAHP advisory committee or a subcommittee is held in person.
Section 6. KRS 321.187 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each veterinarian or AAHP who provides medical services to animals shall maintain accurate electronic or
legibly written medical records that include the identity of the credential holder or authorized representative
who makes the entry.
(2) The information in the medical records are the property of the client, and the client has a right to a copy of
those records. The practice where the records were prepared shall be the official records custodian. Original
patient records shall be retained by the practice, the veterinary facility or AAHP facility where they were
prepared, or the veterinarian or AAHP[veterinarian, or AAHP] who prepared them and be readily retrievable
for a period of five (5) years following the last patient encounter.[ Records shall not be stored by a third party
without a record of signed, informed consent by the client.] Records stored by a third party shall not relieve the
veterinarian or AAHP from the responsibility of supplying records to the client upon request.
(3) (a) The veterinarian or AAHP may require that a request for medical records be in writing and may charge
a reasonable fee for copying or the staff time in preparing the requested medical records, unless there is
a board investigation, in which case no charges shall be authorized.
(b) Copies of the medical records shall be provided to the client, designated veterinarian, AAHP[
permittee], or authorized representative within seven (7) calendar days after receipt of a proper request
or sooner in accordance with the patient's medical condition.
(c) Failure to provide the medical records in a timely fashion upon proper request shall be considered
unprofessional conduct.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) All records required by law to be kept by a veterinarian or AAHP shall be open to inspection by the board or
its authorized representatives, and a copy shall be provided immediately upon request.
(5) All records shall comply with the requirements set forth by the board in administrative regulations.
(6) An animal patient's medical record and medical condition is confidential and may not be furnished to or
discussed with any person other than the client or other veterinarians, veterinary technicians, veterinary
assistants, veterinary practice staff, veterinary students, AAHPs[AAHP permittees], or consultants involved in
the care or treatment of the patient, except upon authorization of the client or under the following
circumstances:
(a) Access to the records is specifically required by law, or as described in KRS 321.185 and 321.188;
(b) In response to a court order or subpoena with notice given to the client or the client's legal
representative;
(c) For statistical and scientific research, if the information is abstracted in a way as to protect the identity
of the patient and client;
(d) As part of an inspection or investigation conducted by the board or an agent of the board;
(e) To verify the rabies vaccination status of an animal to local law enforcement, or to state or local health
departments;
(f) In the course of a consultation; and
(g) As required by other state or federal law.
(7) A veterinarian or AAHP shall not intentionally create a false record, make a false statement, or alter or modify
any medical record, document, or report concerning treatment of a patient. When correcting a medical record,
the original content should be readable, and the alteration shall be clearly identified with the correction, reason
for correction, date, and author's name.
Section 7. KRS 321.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No provision of this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any of the following:
(a) Any persons from gratuitously treating animals in cases of emergency care, provided they do not use
the word "veterinarian," "veterinary," "veterinary technician," "veterinary nurse," or any title, words,
abbreviation, or letters in a manner or under circumstances which may induce the belief that the person
using them is qualified to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine or the practice of veterinary
technology as described in KRS 321.181;
(b) 1. The owner of any animal or animals, the owner's full-time, or part-time, regular employees, or
the owner's agent from caring for and treating animals maintained in their custody, including but
not limited to euthanasia of livestock or administering drugs that are obtained and used in
accordance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations to, any animals belonging to
the owner. With the exception of paragraph (c) of this subsection and other limiting statutes,
treatment shall not include surgery.
2. Transfer of ownership, a temporary contract, or a temporary change in a person's employment
status shall not be used for the purpose of circumventing this provision.
3. This provision shall not exempt an employee who would otherwise qualify for a board credential
from the credentialing requirements of this chapter based on the employment status;
(c) Any person from castrating and dehorning food animals, as long as any drugs or medications are
obtained and used in accordance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations governing
controlled substances, legend drugs, and veterinary drugs;
(d) Any veterinary student as defined in KRS 321.181 from working under the direct supervision of a
veterinarian who is licensed under this chapter;
(e) Unlicensed graduate veterinarians in the United States Armed Services or employees of the United
States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, from engaging in the
performance of their official duties;
(f) Other lawfully qualified veterinarians who reside in and are licensed in other jurisdictions from
discussing or meeting, either in person or via telehealth, with licensed veterinarians of this

CHAPTER 87 13
Commonwealth in consultation about a patient so long as the Kentucky-licensed veterinarian has
established and maintains a current VCPR with the patient;
(g) A trainer, sales agent, or herdsman from caring for animals, upon instruction from a Kentucky-licensed
veterinarian, provided there is a current VCPR as defined in KRS 321.185;
(h) A university faculty member or unlicensed veterinarian employee from teaching veterinary science or
related courses, providing services offered by the university's veterinary diagnostic laboratory, or from
engaging in veterinary research through or on behalf of the university where the person is employed,
including drug and drug testing research, provided that research is conducted in accordance with
applicable state and federal statutes and regulations governing controlled substances, prescription drugs,
veterinary drugs, and legend drugs. This provision shall not exempt the university faculty member or
unlicensed veterinarian employee from the requirements of licensure if the person engages in the
practice of veterinary medicine outside the authority of the university or the scope of employment with
the university or engages in the private practice of veterinary medicine for compensation;
(i) Any person who holds a postgraduate degree in reproductive physiology or a related field, and who has
performed embryo transfers in Kentucky during the five (5) years immediately preceding July 14, 1992,
from performing embryo transfers on animals;
(j) Volunteer health practitioners providing services under KRS 39A.350 to 39A.366;
(k) A retailer or its agent from providing information and suggestions regarding the over-the-counter
products it sells to treat animals so long as the information and suggestions are consistent with the
product label and species appropriate;
(l) A Kentucky-licensed veterinarian from inspecting an animal, or an animal's radiographs or other
medical records, on behalf of a potential buyer or potential seller, without regard to the existence of a
VCPR;
(m) Any persons from implanting a microchip in an animal for the purposes of identification or the
establishment of ownership;
(n) A veterinarian who is licensed in another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada, is in good
standing in that jurisdiction, meets all criteria for licensure in Kentucky, and who has an active
application on file with the board pending for less than ninety (90) days, from working as a veterinarian
in Kentucky under the supervision of a Kentucky-licensed veterinarian while the board application for
licensure is being processed, so long as the place of employment, start date, contact information where
the applicant works, and a supervising veterinarian are disclosed in the application;
(o) Allied animal health professionals[professional permittees] who are working within the scope of the
license[permit];
(p) Certified animal euthanasia specialists who are working within the scope of their certificate; or
(q) Volunteer health practitioners consulting with and assisting a licensed veterinarian at a facility
accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums from assisting in the care of and procedures on
the zoo animals at the facility while under the supervision of the veterinarian.
(2) (a) An unlicensed veterinarian who does not qualify for licensure in Kentucky and who is a nonresident of
the United States may be employed in this Commonwealth to engage in the practice of veterinary
medicine for not more than thirty (30) days in a calendar year, provided the person:
1. Holds a valid, current license as a veterinarian in the person's home country;
2. Practices under the direct supervision of a veterinarian licensed in Kentucky;
3. Registers with the board prior to commencing practice in the Commonwealth; and
4. Agrees to practice and follow all the rules and administrative regulations of this chapter and be
subject to discipline for violations of those rules and administrative regulations by the Kentucky
Board of Veterinary Examiners.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to a nonresident of the United States who is otherwise eligible for a
Kentucky license or other credential under this chapter.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall interfere with the professional activities of any licensed pharmacist.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 8. KRS 321.207 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Board of Veterinary Examiners, upon submission of a complete application and payment
of a fee established by the board, shall issue to any animal control agency[shelter] that it determines to
be qualified, an authorization to apply to the United States Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) for
a controlled substance registration for the purchase, possession, storage, and administration of the
specific drugs approved by the board to euthanize or sedate animals for euthanasia for animals owned
by the certified animal control agency, or in the case of emergency care related to injured, sick, or
abandoned animals.
(b) A certified animal control agency that successfully obtains a DEA controlled substance registration
shall comply with all state and federal laws related to the ordering, purchase, storage, tracking,
management, and disposal of the drugs obtained under the controlled substance registration.
(c) A certified animal control agency shall comply with certification renewal requirements as set forth in
KRS 321.208 or the certificate shall expire.
(2) A certified animal control agency shall comply with administrative regulations promulgated by the board
which contain standards for proper storage and handling of the drugs the board has approved for this use, and
any other provisions as may be necessary to ensure that the drugs are used safely and solely for the purpose set
forth in this section.
(3) (a) A certified animal control agency shall submit to periodic inspections by the board or its authorized
representatives to ensure compliance with DEA controlled substance registration and board
requirements.
(b) An applicant for certification as a certified animal control agency shall submit to an inspection by the
board or its authorized representatives prior to certification by the board to ensure adequate security for
controlled substances storage.
(c) A previously certified animal control agency with an expired certificate shall submit to inspections by
the board or its authorized representatives to ensure proper log updates, removal, and disposal of all
drugs obtained under the DEA controlled substance registration.
(4) Upon submission of a complete application, payment of a fee established by the board, and successful
completion of a board-approved animal euthanasia specialist training course by the applicant, the Kentucky
Board of Veterinary Examiners shall issue to a person whom it determines to be qualified, a certificate for the
person to function as a certified animal euthanasia specialist, subject to the following restrictions:
(a) A certified animal euthanasia specialist shall comply with certification renewal requirements as set forth
in KRS 321.208 or the certificate shall expire;
(b) A certified animal euthanasia specialist shall maintain an employment relationship with a certified
animal control agency to be qualified to practice animal euthanasia;
(c) A certified animal euthanasia specialist is authorized to perform euthanasia only on the premises of the
certified animal control agency, except in case of emergency care;
(d) A certified animal euthanasia specialist shall euthanize only animals that are owned by the certified
animal control agency or in cases of emergency care. Transfer of ownership or a temporary contract
shall not be used for the purpose of circumventing this subsection;
(e) A certified animal euthanasia specialist shall not perform euthanasia at a private residence; and
(f) A certified animal euthanasia specialist shall not perform euthanasia for compensation, except for
compensation from the certified animal euthanasia specialist's employment relationship with a certified
animal control agency.
(5) Euthanasia of animals in a certified animal control agency shall only be performed by:
(a) A licensed veterinarian;
(b) A licensed veterinary technician functioning under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian; or
(c) A certified animal euthanasia specialist as provided for in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A certified animal control agency that employs a certified animal euthanasia specialist may purchase, possess,
and administer the specific drugs approved by the board in an administrative regulation for the euthanasia or

CHAPTER 87 15
sedation of animals for euthanasia. The specific drugs approved by the board shall be the only drugs used by
certified animal euthanasia specialists for the euthanasia of animals or sedation of animals for euthanasia in a
certified animal control agency.
(7) Certified animal control agencies and certified animal euthanasia specialists shall be required to renew their
certificates at intervals, upon conditions, and upon the payment of fees established by the board through the
promulgation of administrative regulations.
(8) (a) A veterinarian who is contracted or otherwise employed by an animal shelter shall not store drugs
obtained under the veterinarian's DEA controlled substance registration in the same locked storage unit
where the drugs obtained under another DEA controlled substance registration are stored.
(b) Separate and secure storage arrangements, drug logs, drug order forms, and secure, limited access shall
be required for each separate DEA controlled substance registration.
(c) A veterinarian shall not store drugs ordered under the veterinarian's DEA controlled substance
registration at an animal shelter unless the DEA controlled substance registration under which the drugs
are ordered lists the animal shelter address as the registrant address.
Section 9. KRS 321.230 is amended to read as follows:
There hereby is created a board to be known as the Kentucky Board of Veterinary Examiners.
(1) The board shall consist of eleven (11) members:
(a) Ten (10) members shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:
1. Seven (7) members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth and shall be veterinarians, each
lawfully engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine in this Commonwealth for at least two
(2) years immediately preceding the date of the member's appointment;
2. One (1) member shall be a citizen of the Commonwealth and shall be a citizen at large who is not
associated with or financially interested in the practices or businesses regulated;
3. One (1) member shall be a citizen of the Commonwealth and a licensed veterinary technician
who has been employed in the veterinary field in the Commonwealth for at least two (2) years
immediately preceding the date of the member's appointment; and
4. One (1) member shall be a licensed[an] allied animal health professional[ permittee] who has
been working on animals in the Commonwealth for at least two (2) years immediately preceding
the date of the member's appointment; and
(b) One (1) member shall be the Commissioner of Agriculture or designee.
(2) The Governor's appointments to the board shall maintain a composition that includes diverse representation
from each of the following areas:
(a) Species of animals served, including food animals, equines, and small animals; and
(b) All regional areas of the Commonwealth, including eastern Kentucky, western Kentucky, central
Kentucky, and northern Kentucky.
(3) All appointed members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years and shall serve until the member is
reappointed or a qualified successor is appointed. The terms shall be evenly staggered, so that no more than
three (3) members are appointed to full terms in any given calendar year.
(4) Any vacancy in the appointed membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment
by the Governor.
(5) Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day or substantial part of
a day of service actually given in carrying out the member's duties under this chapter, in addition to the
member's necessary traveling, hotel, and contingent expenses incurred in attending the meetings of the board
and in the performance of the member's duties.
(6) A board member may be removed by the Governor, or removed by a three-fourths (3/4) majority vote of the
board upon one (1) or more of the following grounds:
(a) A poor attendance record, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The refusal or inability for any reason of a board member to perform the duties as a member of the
board in an efficient, responsible, and professional manner;
(c) The misuse of office by a member of the board to obtain financial or material gain or advantage
personally or for another through the office;
(d) A final adjudication by a recognized body, including the courts, that the board member is in violation of
the laws governing the practice of veterinary medicine, the practice of veterinary technology, or other
board credentialed profession; or
(e) Other just and reasonable causes as determined solely by the board pursuant to applicable law. In these
cases, removal of a member of the board shall be in accordance with KRS Chapters 13A and 13B and
other applicable laws.
Section 10. KRS 321.236 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A defining:
(a) Application, renewal, and reinstatement requirements and fees for veterinary facilities and AAHP
facilities;
(b) Responsibilities and limitations for registered responsible parties, veterinarian managers, and AAHP
managers. This shall include an administrative regulation governing interference or control by
unlicensed persons in the practice of veterinary medicine or veterinary technology, or by persons who
do not hold a board credential. Both registered responsible parties and veterinarian managers shall be
responsible for a registered veterinary facility's operation and management, and both registered
responsible parties and AAHP managers shall be responsible for a registered AAHP facility. Both
parties associated with a registered facility shall be held accountable to the board as a credential holder
for any violation of this chapter; and
(c) Minimum standards for veterinary facilities, mobile facilities, and AAHP facilities, including
requirements for application, inspection, sanitation, and other factors.
(2) (a) All existing veterinary facilities and AAHP facilities, both fixed and mobile, shall be registered with the
board not later than June 30, 2025.
(b) The board shall charge a minimum fee of two hundred dollars ($200) per initial registration.
(c) For initial registrations filed with the board by June 30, 2025, the initial registration fee shall be reduced
by half to one hundred dollars ($100).
(d) After initial registration, the board shall not charge more for a facility registration renewal fee than the
cost to run the registration program.
(3) (a) After June 30, 2025, all new facilities shall submit a completed application for registration to the board,
including fees as promulgated by the board in administrative regulation.
(b) A new veterinary facility or AAHP facility shall not begin operation in the Commonwealth until the
completed application and fee have been accepted by the board and notification in writing has been sent
to the applicant.
(c) After the registration deadline in 2025, each new registered facility may be inspected by the board to
verify that the facility is an operational veterinary facility or AAHP facility within the first one hundred
twenty (120) days of operation.
(4) A mobile facility that is affiliated with a registered veterinary facility or AAHP facility shall be exempted from
the requirement to register independently if a currently registered fixed facility identifies that unit as its
affiliate. The board may charge additional registration fees to a registered veterinary facility or AAHP facility
based upon the number of registered mobile units associated with a single facility registration through the
promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) Each application to register a veterinary facility or an AAHP facility shall meet the minimum requirements
established by this chapter and the board in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A and identify the following persons responsible for its operation and management:
(a) The registered responsible party;
(b) The veterinarian manager, if a veterinary facility; or

CHAPTER 87 17
(c) The AAHP manager, if an AAHP facility.
(6) (a) The veterinarian manager shall include at least one (1) Kentucky-licensed veterinarian with an active
license in good standing with the board.
(b) The AAHP manager shall include at least one (1) Kentucky-licensed[permitted] AAHP with an active
license[permit] in good standing with the board.
(7) (a) The veterinarian manager and the registered responsible party are responsible for notifying the board of
any change in the veterinarian manager's or registered responsible party's association with the
veterinary facility.
(b) The AAHP manager and the registered responsible party are responsible for notifying the board of any
change in the allied animal health professional's or registered responsible party's association with the
AAHP facility.
(8) An application for registration renewal shall be completed and submitted to the board periodically after the
initial registration deadline in 2025, in accordance with KRS 321.203 and as set forth in administrative
regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(9) The board may conduct voluntary inspections in accordance with the following:
(a) Veterinary facilities and AAHP facilities shall be provided an option to conduct a self-inspection at the
facility and may consult with the board or request a board inspection to ensure the facility is meeting
minimum standards as established in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A;
(b) The board may charge a fee for in-person consultations and inspections as established in an
administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A;
(c) Voluntary consultations or inspections by the board shall not trigger a notice to comply or a notice of
violation for deficiencies. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the board from filing a
grievance based upon a significant violation impacting public health, safety, and welfare, and animal
health;
(d) Each registered facility that passes a voluntary, in-person inspection by the board shall receive a
certificate of inspection from the board for display in the registered facility;
(e) Inspections of mobile units shall not extend into a registrant's private residence; and
(f) This subsection shall not prevent the board from conducting inspections at or implementing disciplinary
action against a registered facility in response to a complaint, grievance, or upon a suspected violation
of this chapter.
(10) The board may revoke, suspend, or take other disciplinary action deemed appropriate against the registrant,
including ordering closure of the veterinary facility or AAHP facility, in accordance with KRS 321.351 and
321.353 on any of the following grounds:
(a) The board or its agents are denied access to conduct an inspection or investigation;
(b) The holder of a registration does not pay all prescribed fees or monetary penalties;
(c) There is no veterinarian manager or AAHP manager identified within the timeframes set by this
chapter;
(d) Registered responsible parties are interfering with, exercising control over, or attempting to influence
the professional judgment of a credential holder in any manner;
(e) Failure to comply with minimum standards defined in an administrative regulation promulgated by the
board for the veterinary facility or AAHP facility; or
(f) Failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated under
this chapter.
(11) The board may require any veterinarian manager applicant, AAHP manager applicant, or registered
responsible party applicant to submit to a criminal background investigation conducted in accordance with
KRS 321.189.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 11. Any valid permit held by an allied animal health professional under KRS Chapter 321 shall
automatically become an allied animal health professional license on the effective date of this Act.
Signed by Governor March 25, 2025.